Montana, session 2025, HB30.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 3-2-701, MCA, is amended to read:
"3-2-701. Power of court over rules -- deference to legislative acts. (1) The supreme court of this
state shall have the power to may regulate the pleading, practice, and procedure, and the forms thereof of
these, in civil actions in all courts of this state by rules promulgated by it the supreme court from time to time for
the purpose of simplifying judicial proceedings in the courts of Montana and for promoting the speedy
determination of litigation upon on its merits. Such rules shall may not abridge, enlarge, or modify the
substantive rights of any litigant and shall may not be inconsistent with the constitution of the state of Montana.
(2) Except in cases in which the state constitution explicitly mandates a different standard of
review, if in a proceeding before a Montana court a party challenges a state legislative act as violative of the
state constitution, the supreme court shall uphold the legislative act unless the challenger demonstrates that the
legislative act is unconstitutional beyond a reasonable doubt."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 30